Florida, session 2026, HB857.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Subsection (29) of section 1001.42, Florida
Statutes, is renumbered as subsection (30), and a new subsection
(29) is added to that section, to read:
1001.42 Powers and duties of district school board.—The
district school board, acting as a board, shall exercise all
Page 1 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb857-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 857 2026
powers and perform all duties listed below:
(29) NONDISCRIMINATORY AND SAFE STUDENT PROGRAMS AND
SERVICES.—
(a) A district school board may refer students to
organizations that provide student support services, including
student support programs that incorporate mentoring, counseling,
tutoring, and extracurricular programs.
(b) To be eligible to be recommended, endorsed, referred,
or otherwise promoted by a school district:
1. An organization may not restrict participation on the
basis of race, color, or ethnicity.
2. A mentoring organization that represents through its
website, publications, or promotional materials that it serves
students of a single race or ethnic group must provide written
verification to the district school board demonstrating that the
organization employs or engages mentors, staff, or volunteers
from diverse racial and ethnic backgrounds sufficient to serve
the district's student population before the district may
recommend or refer students to the organization.
3.a. An organization must ensure that each person who
comes into contact with students, or is present in the same
building while services are being provided to students, has
successfully completed a Level 2 background screening pursuant
to s. 435.04. Each organization is responsible for initiating
and maintaining its own level 2 background screenings and
Page 2 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb857-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 857 2026
providing such documentation to the district school board. The
district school board may impose a fee to review the
documentation and comply with the requirements of this
subsection. A person may not provide or assist in providing
student support services on behalf of such organization without
the level 2 screening.
b. This subparagraph applies to services that are provided
on campus or off campus.
c. This subparagraph does not apply to off-campus, school-
sponsored activities where students are under the direct
supervision of school personnel, school volunteers, or athletic
coaches employed or contracted by the school district if such
personnel, volunteers, or coaches remain present for the
duration of the activity and maintain responsibility for student
safety and supervision.
(c) Each public school that provides or hosts mentoring or
student support services shall post and maintain information
regarding the available programs on the school website. The
information must include all of the following:
1. The name and description of each program available to
students.
2. The eligibility requirements for participation in each
program.
3. The contact information for the program coordinator or
designated school personnel for the program.
Page 3 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb857-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 857 2026
4. The application process or participation requirements
for each program.
(d) The district school board shall ensure compliance with
this subsection and maintain documentation demonstrating that an
organization meets the requirements of paragraph (b).
(e) Each district school superintendent shall, upon the
request of the Department of Education, submit a report
demonstrating compliance with this subsection within 30 days
after such request. The report must include all of the following
information:
1. The total number of public schools within the district
that participated in mentoring or student support programs
during the previous school year, including the names and
addresses of the schools.
2. The name of each organization providing such mentoring
or student support programs within the district and the type of
services the organization provided.
3. Evidence that each participating organization meets the
requirements of paragraph (b).
4. The percentage of schools served by mentoring or
student-support programs.
5. The total number of students served by mentoring or
student support programs during the previous school year.
6. Disaggregated demographic information of the students
100 served by each mentoring or student-support program, including
Page 4 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb857-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 857 2026
101 race, ethnicity, and grade level.
102 7. Any additional information requested by the department.
103 Section 2. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 5 of 5
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb857-00